Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, subdivision 26, is amended to read: Subd. 26. Social Security benefits. deleted text begin (a) A taxpayer is allowed a subtraction equal to the greater of the simplified subtraction allowed under paragraph (b) or the alternate subtraction determined under paragraph (e). deleted text end deleted text begin (b) A taxpayer's simplified subtraction equals the amount of taxable social security benefits, as reduced under paragraphs (c) and (d). deleted text end deleted text begin (c) For a taxpayer other than a married taxpayer filing a separate return with adjusted gross income above the phaseout threshold, the simplified subtraction is reduced by ten percent for each $4,000 of adjusted gross income, or fraction thereof, in excess of the phaseout threshold. The phaseout threshold equals: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) $100,000 for a married taxpayer filing a joint return or surviving spouse; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) $78,000 for a single or head of household taxpayer; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) for a married taxpayer filing a separate return, half the amount for a married taxpayer filing a joint return. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) For a married taxpayer filing a separate return, the simplified subtraction is reduced by ten percent for each $2,000 of adjusted gross income, or fraction thereof, in excess of the phaseout threshold. deleted text end deleted text begin (e) A taxpayer's alternate subtraction equals the lesser of taxable Social Security benefits or a maximum subtraction subject to the limits under paragraphs (f), (g), and (h). deleted text end deleted text begin (f) For married taxpayers filing a joint return and surviving spouses, the maximum subtraction under paragraph (c) equals $5,840. The maximum subtraction is reduced by 20 percent of provisional income over $88,630. In no case is the subtraction less than zero. deleted text end deleted text begin (g) For single or head-of-household taxpayers, the maximum subtraction under paragraph (c) equals $4,560. The maximum subtraction is reduced by 20 percent of provisional income over $69,250. In no case is the subtraction less than zero. deleted text end deleted text begin (h) For married taxpayers filing separate returns, the maximum subtraction under paragraph (c) equals one-half the maximum subtraction for joint returns under paragraph (f). The maximum subtraction is reduced by 20 percent of provisional income over one-half the threshold amount specified in paragraph (d). In no case is the subtraction less than zero. deleted text end deleted text begin (i) For purposes of this subdivision, "provisional income" means modified adjusted gross income as defined in section 86(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus one-half of the taxable Social Security benefits received during the taxable year, and "Social Security benefits" has the meaning given in section 86(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code. deleted text end deleted text begin (j) The commissioner shall adjust the phaseout threshold amounts in paragraphs (c) and (d) as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is taxable year 2023. The maximum subtraction and threshold amounts as adjusted must be rounded to the nearest $10 amount. If the amount ends in $5, the amount is rounded up to the nearest $10 amount. deleted text end new text begin The amount of Social Security benefits received is a subtraction. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end